New York, session 2025-2026, A7013.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 13 of section 3614 of the
public health law, as added by section 4 of part H of chapter 59 of the
laws of 2011, is amended and a new paragraph (d) is added to read as
follows:
(b) Initial base year episodic payments shall be based on Medicaid
paid claims, as determined and adjusted by the commissioner to achieve
savings comparable to the prior state fiscal year, for services provided
by all certified home health agencies in the base year two thousand
nine. Subsequent base year episodic payments may be based on Medicaid
paid claims for services provided by all certified home health agencies
in a base year subsequent to two thousand nine, as determined by the
commissioner, provided, however, that such base year adjustment shall be
made not less frequently than every three years. In determining case
mix, each patient shall be classified using a system based on measures
which may include, but not limited to, clinical and functional measures,
as reported on the federal Outcome and Assessment Information Set
(OASIS), as may be amended. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law or regulation to the contrary, the commissioner is authorized to
increase, as necessary, the episodic payment level for costs not
reflected in the statewide base, subject to the approval of the director
of the state division of budget, including the cost of: inflationary
increases in the health care market basket and/or consumer price index
impacting providers; new state or federally mandated program regulatory
requirements; home care staff recruitment and retention needs, partic-
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD10053-02-5

A. 7013--A 2
ularly in shortage areas and disciplines; facilitating provider capabil-
ity to further align with state health reform models and policy goals;
health care clinical and information technology investments; and any
other matters the commissioner determines appropriate.
(d) Notwithstanding any inconsistent law or regulation, by October
first, two thousand twenty-five and annually thereafter, the commis-
sioner shall make the system of episodic payments, including all pricing
mechanisms, available to all Medicaid managed care plans licensed to
operate in New York state, all child health insurance plans licensed to
operate under section twenty-five hundred eleven of this chapter, and
all Essential Plans authorized by section three hundred sixty-nine-gg of
the social services law. By October first, two thousand twenty-five and
annually thereafter, the commissioner shall notify all such managed care
plans of their responsibilities for ensuring that their enrolled members
have access to certified home health agency services; that such services
are critical to improving patient care and reducing overall costs,
particularly costs related to avoidable hospital use; and that episodic
payments as described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision are consid-
ered the standard method of certified home health agency payment by New
York state government agencies. Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude
a managed care plan and certified home health agency from agreeing upon
an alternative rate methodology and payment rate, including value-based
payments related to health outcome measurements.
§ 2. This act shall take effect immediately.